Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.325.020

Associated student bodies—Powers and responsibilities affecting.

As used in this section, an "associated student body" means the formal organization of the students of a school formed with the approval of and regulation by the board of directors of the school district in conformity to the rules and regulations promulgated by the superintendent of public instruction: PROVIDED, That the board of directors of a school district may act or delegate the authority to an employee of the district to act as the associated student body for any school plant facility within the district containing no grade higher than the sixth grade.

The superintendent of public instruction, after consultation with appropriate school organizations and students, shall promulgate rules and regulations to designate the powers and responsibilities of the boards of directors of the school districts of the state of Washington in developing efficient administration, management, and control of moneys, records, and reports of the associated student bodies organized in the public schools of the state.

[ 1984 c 98 s 1; 1975 1st ex.s. c 284 s 3; 1973 c 52 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.58.115.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975 1st ex.s. c 284: See note following RCW 28A.325.010.